Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Miscellaneous Provisions

120.350.
Compensation,
powers and duties of witnesses and officers in election contest cases.

The compensation of witnesses
and officers taking depositions, and their powers and duties, shall be the
same in election contest cases as in actions in equity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 176.

120.360.
Prohibition
of agreement by candidate not to contest election.

It shall be unlawful for any
candidate in any primary or general election to agree not to file a suit contesting
the election, or to agree to dismiss or cease prosecuting such suit after
it has been filed, in consideration of the payment or promise to pay to him,
or to any other person, of any money, deputyship, clerkship, employment, or
anything of value by such successful candidate or by any other person. Any
person who violates this section shall be ineligible thereafter to hold, or
become a candidate for nomination or election to, any public office in this
state, or to have his name printed on any official ballot in a primary or
general election. Any qualified voter may maintain an action to enjoin the
printing of the name of a person upon the official ballots for any primary
or general election, on the ground that such person has violated this section,
and in such action the violation may be proved by parol evidence.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 177.